Florida, session 2026, SB1600.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 51 52 Section 1.âPresent subsections (3) through (13) and 53 subsections (14) through (91) of section 39.01, Florida 54 Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) through (14) and 55 subsections (16) through (93), respectively, new subsections (3) 56 and (15) are added to that section, and present subsections (10) 57 and (39) of that section are amended, to read: 58 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 59 context otherwise requires: 60 (3)ââAccredited child safety organizationâ means an 61 organization that has been certified or accredited by a 62 qualified accrediting organization that is recognized and 63 approved by the department. For purposes of this subsection, the 64 term âcertified or accreditedâ means an evidence-based and 65 independent validation process managed through a professional 66 association or accrediting organization. 67 (11)(10)ââCaregiverâ means the parent, legal custodian, 68 permanent guardian, adult household member, or other person 69 responsible for a childâs welfare as defined in subsection (59) 70 (57). 71 (15)ââChild-serving organizationâ means any public or 72 private agency, organization, facility, or institution that 73 provides organized programming for children, including, but not 74 limited to, public or private schools, public or private child 75 care facilities and day care centers, residential homes, day 76 camps, youth sports organizations, and other organizations whose 77 employees or volunteers are adults entrusted with a childâs 78 care. 79 (41)(39)ââInstitutional child abuse or neglectâ means 80 situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect in which 81 the person allegedly perpetrating the child abuse or neglect is 82 an employee of or volunteer at a child-serving organization a 83 public or private school, public or private day care center, 84 residential home, institution, facility, or agency or any other 85 person at such institution responsible for the childâs welfare 86 as defined in subsection (59) (57). 87 Section 2.âSection 39.0151, Florida Statutes, is created to 88 read: 89 39.0151âTraining and certification of child-serving 90 organizations.â 91 (1)âEach child-serving organization and each agency that 92 contracts with the department or the Department of Juvenile 93 Justice shall provide to all employees annual training relating 94 to the protection of children from abuse and neglect. The 95 training must be approved by the Department of Children and 96 Families and include, at a minimum, instruction on all of the 97 following: 98 (a)âCommon signs and symptoms of child abuse and neglect. 99 (b)âTechniques for preventing child abuse and neglect, 100 including, but not limited to, techniques for ensuring proper 101 boundaries to prevent abuse, screening standards, and 102 supervision techniques designed to avoid inappropriate adult 103 child interactions. 104 (c)âProcedures for responding to a suspected case of child 105 abuse or neglect, including, but not limited to, any mandated 106 reporting responsibilities and procedures; procedures for 107 ensuring the childâs safety and emotional well-being; and 108 procedures necessary to achieve an appropriate investigation of 109 any child abuse or neglect allegations. 110 (d)âInformation regarding sex trafficking and child sexual 111 exploitation, including steps to identify suspected victims. 112 (e)âChild-friendly procedures necessary to prevent a child 113 victim of abuse or neglect from suffering further trauma or 114 revictimization, to protect the childâs privacy, and to assist 115 the childâs recovery. 116 (2)(a)âThe Department of Children and Families shall create 117 a process to recognize and approve qualified accrediting 118 organizations that are authorized to accredit or certify child 119 serving organizations as accredited child safety organizations. 120 The department shall recognize and approve a qualified 121 accrediting organization if such organization meets all of the 122 following requirements: 123 1.âThe organization is a nonprofit organization authorized 124 to operate in this state. 125 2.âThe organization has developed a curriculum or program 126 that substantially meets the requirements of subsection (1) and 127 offers such curriculum or program to child-serving 128 organizations. The curriculum or program must be provided to the 129 department for review, along with any other information 130 requested by the department. 131 3.âThe organization can demonstrate to the satisfaction of 132 the department a record of providing child abuse prevention and 133 response training to child-serving organizations in this state 134 for at least 2 years before the organization submits its 135 application to the department for recognition and approval. 136 (b)âOnce approved by the department, a qualified 137 accrediting organization must maintain a record of all training 138 it provides to child-serving organizations and annually submit 139 such record to the department. As part of its record, a 140 qualified accrediting organization must maintain the following: 141 1.âA list of child-serving organizations that are trained 142 and become accredited child safety organizations. 143 2.âParticipant evaluations from all of the trainings the 144 qualified accrediting organization has provided. 145 (c)âThe department must review the status of each qualified 146 accrediting organization on a biannual basis; however, the 147 department may conduct a review of each qualified accrediting 148 organizationâs status at any time. The department may revoke its 149 recognition and approval of a qualified accrediting organization 150 for good cause. 151 (d)âThe status of an accredited child safety organization 152 must be reviewed by the department at least every 3 years and 153 the accreditation or certification of such organization may be 154 renewed or revoked by the department upon such review. 155 Section 3.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 156 39.101, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 157 39.101âCentral abuse hotline.âThe central abuse hotline is 158 the first step in the safety assessment and investigation 159 process. 160 (3)âCOLLECTION OF INFORMATION AND DATA.âThe department 161 shall: 162 (f)1.âCollect and analyze child-on-child sexual abuse 163 reports and include such information in the aggregate 164 statistical reports. 165 2.âCollect and analyze, in separate statistical reports, 166 those reports of child abuse, sexual abuse, and juvenile sexual 167 abuse which are reported from or which occurred on or at: 168 a.âSchool premises; 169 b.âSchool transportation; 170 c.âSchool-sponsored off-campus events; 171 d.âA school readiness program provider determined to be 172 eligible under s. 1002.88; 173 e.âA private prekindergarten provider or a public school 174 prekindergarten provider, as those terms are defined in s. 175 1002.51(7) and (8), respectively; 176 f.âA public K-12 school as described in s. 1000.04; 177 g.âA private school as defined in s. 1002.01; 178 h.âA Florida College System institution or a state 179 university, as those terms are defined in s. 1000.21(5) and (9), 180 respectively; or 181 i.âA school, as defined in s. 1005.02; or 182 j.âA child-serving organization. 183 Section 4.âSection 627.0656, Florida Statutes, is created 184 to read: 185 627.0656âInsurance discounts for accredited child safety 186 organizations.âThe office shall approve rating plans for 187 employerâs liability insurance which provide an appropriate 188 reduction in premium charges to child-serving organizations as 189 defined in s. 39.01 which are certified or accredited as 190 accredited child safety organizations by the Department of 191 Children and Families under s. 39.0151(2). The plans must be 192 actuarially sound and must state the savings anticipated to 193 result from a child-serving organization becoming an accredited 194 child safety organization. 195 Section 5.âChild safety and liability insurance study.â 196 (1)âThe Legislature finds that: 197 (a)âRecent studies demonstrate that across the nation, 198 including in this state, organizations that provide services to 199 children face an existential threat to their ability to operate 200 due to the unaffordability, and on occasion unavailability, of 201 liability insurance. 202 (b)âPrivate organizations that provide services to children 203 are essential to the well-being of families and communities. 204 Churches, synagogues, and other faith-based organizations 205 provide child care, organized activities, and educational 206 opportunities for children. Camps, scouting organizations, and 207 youth sports organizations provide children with the opportunity 208 to develop physically and mentally. Other organizations provide 209 residential care, foster care, and respite care for children in 210 difficult circumstances. 211 (c)âThe cost of liability insurance threatens the ability 212 of organizations to provide these services. Recently, the 213 shutdown of private foster agencies in California due to the 214 unavailability of insurance was averted only by legislative 215 intervention. 216 (d)âThe liability coverage affordability and availability 217 crisis for such organizations is driven by factors that include 218 social inflation; nationwide changes affecting the liability of 219 organizations for past incidents resulting in harm to children; 220 and the ongoing challenges of serving children while maintaining 221 proper procedures to screen and supervise employees and 222 volunteers, raise situational awareness of the risks of child 223 abuse within organizations, and take steps to prevent the 224 exploitation or abuse of children in their programs. 225 (e)âPotential methods to ensure that private organizations 226 are able to continue carrying out their valuable work include 227 developing methods to reduce insurance rates, providing state 228 financial support to providers, and developing programs to 229 bolster child abuse and neglect prevention policies and 230 protocols within organizations. 231 (2)âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government 232 Accountability shall conduct a study on the affordability and 233 availability of liability coverage for child-serving 234 organizations as defined in s. 39.01, Florida Statutes. The 235 office shall identify potential legislative actions that may be 236 taken to ensure the continued viability of such organizations 237 and provide a report of its findings to the President of the 238 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by July 239 1, 2027. 240 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 39.302, Florida 241 Statutes, is amended to read: 242 39.302âProtective investigations of institutional child 243 abuse, abandonment, or neglect.â 244 (1)âThe department shall conduct a child protective 245 investigation of each report of institutional child abuse, 246 abandonment, or neglect. Upon receipt of a report that alleges 247 that an employee or agent of the department, or any other entity 248 or person covered by s. 39.01(41) or (59) s. 39.01(39) or (57), 249 acting in an official capacity, has committed an act of child 250 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, the department shall initiate a 251 child protective investigation within the timeframe established 252 under s. 39.101(2) and notify the appropriate state attorney, 253 law enforcement agency, and licensing agency, which shall 254 immediately conduct a joint investigation, unless independent 255 investigations are more feasible. When conducting investigations 256 or having face-to-face interviews with the child, investigation 257 visits shall be unannounced unless it is determined by the 258 department or its agent that unannounced visits threaten the 259 safety of the child. If a facility is exempt from licensing, the 260 department shall inform the owner or operator of the facility of 261 the report. Each agency conducting a joint investigation is 262 entitled to full access to the information gathered by the 263 department in the course of the investigation. A protective 264 investigation must include an interview with the childâs parent 265 or legal guardian. The department shall make a full written 266 report to the state attorney within 3 business days after making 267 the oral report. A criminal investigation shall be coordinated, 268 whenever possible, with the child protective investigation of 269 the department. Any interested person who has information 270 regarding the offenses described in this subsection may forward 271 a statement to the state attorney as to whether prosecution is 272 warranted and appropriate. Within 15 days after the completion 273 of the investigation, the state attorney shall report the 274 findings to the department and shall include in the report a 275 determination of whether or not prosecution is justified and 276 appropriate in view of the circumstances of the specific case. 277 Section 7.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 278 39.521, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 279 39.521âDisposition hearings; powers of disposition.â 280 (1)âA disposition hearing shall be conducted by the court, 281 if the court finds that the facts alleged in the petition for 282 dependency were proven in the adjudicatory hearing, or if the 283 parents or legal custodians have consented to the finding of 284 dependency or admitted the allegations in the petition, have 285 failed to appear for the arraignment hearing after proper 286 notice, or have not been located despite a diligent search 287 having been conducted. 288 (c)âWhen any child is adjudicated by a court to be 289 dependent, the court having jurisdiction of the child has the 290 power by order to: 291 1.âRequire the parent and, when appropriate, the legal 292 guardian or the child to participate in treatment and services 293 identified as necessary. The court may require the person who 294 has custody or who is requesting custody of the child to submit 295 to a mental health or substance abuse disorder assessment or 296 evaluation. The order may be made only upon good cause shown and 297 pursuant to notice and procedural requirements provided under 298 the Florida Rules of Juvenile Procedure. The mental health 299 assessment or evaluation must be administered by a qualified 300 professional as defined in s. 39.01, and the substance abuse 301 assessment or evaluation must be administered by a qualified 302 professional as defined in s. 397.311. The court may also 303 require such person to participate in and comply with treatment 304 and services identified as necessary, including, when 305 appropriate and available, participation in and compliance with 306 a mental health court program established under chapter 394 or a 307 treatment-based drug court program established under s. 397.334. 308 Adjudication of a child as dependent based upon evidence of harm 309 as defined in s. 39.01(39)(g) s. 39.01(37)(g) demonstrates good 310 cause, and the court shall require the parent whose actions 311 caused the harm to submit to a substance abuse disorder 312 assessment or evaluation and to participate and comply with 313 treatment and services identified in the assessment or 314 evaluation as being necessary. In addition to supervision by the 315 department, the court, including the mental health court program 316 or the treatment-based drug court program, may oversee the 317 progress and compliance with treatment by a person who has 318 custody or is requesting custody of the child. The court may 319 impose appropriate available sanctions for noncompliance upon a 320 person who has custody or is requesting custody of the child or 321 make a finding of noncompliance for consideration in determining 322 whether an alternative placement of the child is in the childâs 323 best interests. Any order entered under this subparagraph may be 324 made only upon good cause shown. This subparagraph does not 325 authorize placement of a child with a person seeking custody of 326 the child, other than the childâs parent or legal custodian, who 327 requires mental health or substance abuse disorder treatment. 328 2.âRequire, if the court deems necessary, the parties to 329 participate in dependency mediation. 330 3.âRequire placement of the child either under the 331 protective supervision of an authorized agent of the department 332 in the home of one or both of the childâs parents or in the home 333 of a relative of the child or another adult approved by the 334 court, or in the custody of the department. Protective 335 supervision continues until the court terminates it or until the 336 child reaches the age of 18, whichever date is first. Protective 337 supervision shall be terminated by the court whenever the court 338 determines that permanency has been achieved for the child, 339 whether with a parent, another relative, or a legal custodian, 340 and that protective supervision is no longer needed. The 341 termination of supervision may be with or without retaining 342 jurisdiction, at the courtâs discretion, and shall in either 343 case be considered a permanency option for the child. The order 344 terminating supervision by the department must set forth the 345 powers of the custodian of the child and include the powers 346 ordinarily granted to a guardian of the person of a minor unless 347 otherwise specified. Upon the courtâs termination of supervision 348 by the department, further judicial reviews are not required if 349 permanency has been established for the child. 350 4.âDetermine whether the child has a strong attachment to 351 the prospective permanent guardian and whether such guardian has 352 a strong commitment to permanently caring for the child. 353 Section 8.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 354 39.6012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 355 39.6012âCase plan tasks; services.â 356 (1)âThe services to be provided to the parent and the tasks 357 that must be completed are subject to the following: 358 (c)âIf there is evidence of harm as defined in s. 359 39.01(39)(g) s. 39.01(37)(g), the case plan must include as a 360 required task for the parent whose actions caused the harm that 361 the parent submit to a substance abuse disorder assessment or 362 evaluation and participate and comply with treatment and 363 services identified in the assessment or evaluation as being 364 necessary. 365 Section 9.âParagraph (p) of subsection (4) of section 366 394.495, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 367 394.495âChild and adolescent mental health system of care; 368 programs and services.â 369 (4)âThe array of services may include, but is not limited 370 to: 371 (p)âTrauma-informed services for children who have suffered 372 sexual exploitation as defined in s. 39.01(82)(g) s. 373 39.01(80)(g). 374 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 375 934.255, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 376 934.255âSubpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.â 377 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 378 (c)ââSexual abuse of a childâ means a criminal offense 379 based on any conduct described in s. 39.01(82) s. 39.01(80). 380 Section 11.âSubsection (5) of section 960.065, Florida 381 Statutes, is amended to read: 382 960.065âEligibility for awards.â 383 (5)âA person is not ineligible for an award pursuant to 384 paragraph (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c) if that 385 person is a victim of sexual exploitation of a child as defined 386 in s. 39.01(82)(g) s. 39.01(80)(g). 387 Section 12.âSubsections (1), (2), and (24) of section 388 984.03, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 389 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 390 (1)ââAbandonedâ or âabandonmentâ has the same meaning as in 391 s. 39.01 s. 39.01(1). 392 (2)ââAbuseâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01 s. 393 39.01(2). 394 (24)ââNeglectâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01 s. 395 39.01(53). 396 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 397 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 398 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 399 39.301, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 400 39.301âInitiation of protective investigations.â 401 (2) 402 (b)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcriminal conductâ 403 means: 404 1.âA child is known or suspected to be the victim of child 405 abuse, as defined in s. 827.03, or of neglect of a child, as 406 defined in s. 827.03. 407 2.âA child is known or suspected to have died as a result 408 of abuse or neglect. 409 3.âA child is known or suspected to be the victim of 410 aggravated child abuse, as defined in s. 827.03. 411 4.âA child is known or suspected to be the victim of sexual 412 battery, as defined in s. 827.071, or of sexual abuse, as 413 defined in s. 39.01. 414 5.âA child is known or suspected to be the victim of 415 institutional child abuse or neglect, as defined in s. 39.01, 416 and as provided for in s. 39.302(1). 417 6.âA child is known or suspected to be a victim of human 418 trafficking, as provided in s. 787.06. 419 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.